Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-704
Funding intent.

The Legislature recognizes the generosity of its citizens and charitable organizations that donate their time and money to provide funds to their fellow citizens. It is the intent of the Legislature to permit the Women's Health Initiative of Nebraska to obtain and expend such funds to carry out the purposes of sections 71-701 to 71-707. Private citizens and charitable organizations may donate and grant funds to the Women's Health Initiative of Nebraska to pay for programs, educational materials, promotions, and other activities undertaken by the initiative.

Laws 2000, LB 480, § 4.